Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.630.155

Regional apprenticeship preparation pilot program—Evaluation and report. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, the Washington association for career and technical education, and the work-integrated learning advisory committee established in RCW 28A.300.196, must evaluate the pilot program established in RCW 28A.630.145 and best practices for increasing:

(a) Awareness about career and technical education, including participation in career and technical student organizations, dual credit opportunities, core plus, and career and technical education course equivalencies;

(b) Awareness about preapprenticeship and postsecondary career opportunities for students and employers;

(c) The availability and variety of dual credit and industry-related and postsecondary articulation opportunities; and

(d) Community and industry support for preapprenticeships, internships, externships, and all work-integrated learning opportunities.

(2)(a) By June 30, 2027, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must report the results of the evaluation to the governor, the state board of education, the student achievement council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(b) The report required by this subsection (2) must include: An analysis of barriers to the establishment and support of recognized apprenticeship preparation programs and work-integrated instructional programs; recommended policies to implement recognized apprenticeship preparation programs and work-integrated strategies that increase the college and career readiness of students statewide; and recommendations for legislative action to establish common standards for the operations of regional apprenticeship preparation programs and other work-integrated learning opportunities, and authorize additional regional apprenticeship preparation programs and other work-integrated learning opportunities. The report may also include recommendations for actions to improve the cohesion, coordination, and quality of work-integrated learning opportunities, including regional apprenticeship preparation programs, throughout the state.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "apprenticeship preparation program" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.630.145.

(4) This section expires June 30, 2027.

[ 2023 c 128 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 128: See note following RCW 28A.630.145.